Tennessee, session 114, SB1648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-804, is amended by deleting the
second sentence and substituting:
This part does not affect the operation and effect of chapters 32 and 33 of this
title, and parts 1-7 of this chapter, which continue in full force and effect as
separate and independent authority for the establishment and governance of a
central business improvement or infrastructure development district.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-811, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting:
(a) Upon the filing of an initiating petition, each governing body of a host
municipality required to receive filing of such petition must order a public hearing by the
governing body to determine whether the infrastructure development district will be
established.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-811, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), when a district must be approved by two (2)
or more host municipalities, the governing bodies may hold one (1) or more joint public
hearings, or the governing bodies may hold separate public hearings when a governing
body makes approval contingent on the approval of another governing body.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-814, is amended by deleting
subdivision (7) and substituting:
SB1648
010146
- 1 -

(7) The maximum rate of levy of the special assessment to be imposed;
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-815, is amended by deleting
subsection (d) and substituting:
(d) The maximum term of any bonds, notes, or other debt obligations issued
pursuant to this section to fund the costs of infrastructure, including any refinancing
bonds, must not exceed thirty (30) years from the first issuance of bonds, notes, or other
debt obligations for the purpose of funding infrastructure. For development projects with
multiple phases of development, bonds must be issued for each phase of the
development and each phase must not exceed thirty (30) years from date of issuance of
the bonds for that phase.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-827, is amended by deleting the
language:
Each district established pursuant to this part must be dissolved by the governing
bodies of the host municipality, no later than thirty (30) years from the date the district is
established, or if earlier, immediately upon:
and substituting:
Each district established pursuant to this part must be dissolved by the governing
bodies of the host municipality no later than thirty (30) years from the date that the last
assessment is first levied, or if earlier, immediately upon:
SECTION 7. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010146